Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 5. Accounts, Records, and Reports.

Sec. 42.08.440.
Uniform system of accounts.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier operating under this chapter shall maintain its records and accounts in accordance with the uniform system of accounts for class A natural gas pipelines in 18 C.F.R. 201 (Federal Energy Regulatory Commission), as amended.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 42.08.360.
Renumbered in 2013.

Sec. 42.08.450.
Accounts; records; triennial reports; operating reserve fund.

To the extent necessary for the commission to perform the duties of the commission under this chapter,

the commission may by regulation require an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier or affiliated interest engaged in activities relating to pipelines to establish and maintain as part of its system of accounts continuing property records showing, as to property that is actually being used in pipeline activity in this state, the year of placement in service, original cost, and current location, and, as to a pipeline system, accounts and records in a manner showing, on a current basis, the original cost of the system in the state and related reserves for depreciation;

the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall

keep its accounts for its pipeline facilities located in this state separate from any accounts relating to any other business, including another pipeline facilities business or a subsidiary business, in which it engages, directly or indirectly; except as the commission provides, property, expense, or revenue used in or derived from the other business may not be considered in establishing the rates and charges of the facility;

keep books, accounts, papers, and records required by this chapter or by regulations adopted by the commission under this chapter in an office in this state and may not remove them from the state except upon written authority by the commission; and

file a report with the commission that contains an updated cost study and a calculation of the three-year average actual return on equity; the report shall be filed every three years after the pipeline begins operations, within 90 days after the close of the annual accounting period for the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier, or within additional time granted by the commission upon a showing of good cause.

The commission shall review the cost study described in (a)(2)(C) of this section and verify that, for the rate elements specified in AS

42.08.350(b)

, the carrier is using the same elements that were last approved by the commission. If the carrier does not use the correct rate elements in its triennial report, the commission may require the carrier to recalculate and file a corrected report. If, on the date the report described in (a)(2)(C) of this section is delivered, the report reflects that the three-year average actual return on equity exceeds the approved rate of return, the carrier shall, not later than 90 days after the date the report is delivered, deposit an amount equal to the excess in a segregated operating reserve fund. The carrier shall continue to deposit the excess described in this subsection at the times described in this subsection until the amount in the operating reserve fund is equal to 20 percent of the most recent three-year average of the carrier’s annual operating costs. The carrier may use money in the operating reserve fund to offset any shortage in the recovery of operating costs set out in another triennial report. If a deposit will cause the operating reserve fund to exceed 20 percent of the most recent three-year average of the carrier’s annual operating costs, the amount exceeding 20 percent must be used to reduce, on a volumetric basis, the firm transportation service rates for all shippers for the next three-year period.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)